Hawaii statutes.
§322-2 Ordering owner to remove.
Whenever any such nuisance, foul or noxious odors, gases or vapors, water in
which mosquito larvae exist, source of filth, or cause of sickness or disease
is found on private property, the department of health shall cause notice to be
given to the owner to remove and abate the same at the owner's own expense
within such reasonable time as the department may deem proper. A duplicate of
the notice so given shall be left with one or more of the tenants or occupants
of the premises. If the premises are unoccupied, notice shall be mailed to the
last known place of residence of the owner if residing in the State. If the
owner resides out of the State or cannot be reached with notice speedily,
notice left at the house or posted on the premises shall be sufficient. If the
owner thus notified does not comply with the notification or order of the
department, or its agent, within the time specified, the department or its
agent may apply to the district court of the circuit in which the property is
situated for an order authorizing the department to execute and carry out the
notice or for an order to abate the nuisance and remove, destroy, or prevent
the cause of the foul or noxious odors, gases or vapors, water in which
mosquito larvae exist, source of filth, or cause of sickness or disease, or
other thing detrimental to public health.

The department may recover by appropriate
proceedings the expenses incurred by it in the abatement, removal, destruction,
or prevention, from any person who has caused or allowed the nuisances, source
of foul or noxious odors, gases or vapors, water in which mosquito larvae
breed, source of filth, or cause of sickness or disease, or other thing
detrimental to the public health, and from any owner, tenant, or occupant of
the premises, who, after notice, has failed to abate, remove, destroy, or
prevent the nuisance, source of foul or noxious odors, gases or vapors, water
in which mosquito larvae exist, source of filth, or cause of sickness or
disease, or other thing detrimental to the public health within the time
specified in the notice. In no case shall the department or any officer or
agent thereof be liable for costs in any action or proceeding that may be
commenced in pursuance of this part. [PC 1869, c 59, §10; am L 1911, c 111, §2;
am L 1919, c 80, §1; RL 1925, §924; RL 1935, §1311; RL 1945, §2702; RL 1955,
§47-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §322-2; am L 1970, c 188, §40; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next